Utah statutes.
62A-16-201.   Initial review.
(1)  Within seven days after the day on which the department knows that a
qualified individual has died, a person designated by the department shall:
(a)  complete a deceased client report form, created by the department; and
(b)  forward the completed client report form to the director of the office or
division that has jurisdiction over the region or facility.
(2)  The director of the office or division described in Subsection (1) shall,
upon receipt of a deceased client report form, immediately provide a copy of
the form to:
(a)  the executive director; and
(b)  the fatality review coordinator.
(3)  Within 10 days after the day on which the fatality review coordinator
receives a copy of the deceased client report form, the fatality review
coordinator shall request a copy of all relevant department case records
regarding the individual who is the subject of the deceased client report
form.
(4)  Each person who receives a request for a record described in Subsection
(3) shall provide a copy of the record to the fatality review coordinator, by
a secure method, within seven days after the day on which the request is made.
(5)  Within 30 days after the day on which the fatality review coordinator
receives the case records requested under Subsection (3), the fatality review
coordinator, or a designee of the fatality review coordinator, shall:
(a)  review the deceased client report form, the case files, and other
relevant information received by the fatality review coordinator; and
(b)  make a recommendation to the director of the Office of Services Review
regarding whether a formal fatality review should be conducted.
(6) (a)  In accordance with Subsection (6)(b), within seven days after the day
on which the fatality review coordinator makes the recommendation described in
Subsection (5)(b), the director of the Office of Services Review shall
determine whether to order that a formal fatality review be conducted.
(b)  The director of the Office of Services Review shall order that a formal
fatality review be conducted if:
(i)  at the time of death, the qualified individual is:
(A)  an individual described in Subsection 62A-16-102(2)(a) or (b), unless:
(I)  the death is due to a natural cause; or
(II)  the director of the Office of Services Review determines that the death
was not in any way related to services that were provided by, or under the
direction of, the department or a division of the department; or
(B)  a child in foster care or substitute care, unless the death is due to:
(I)  a natural cause; or
(II)  an accident;
(ii)  it appears, based on the information provided to the director of the
Office of Services Review, that:
(A)  a provision of law, rule, policy, or procedure relating to the deceased
individual or the deceased individual's family may not have been complied
with;
(B)  the fatality was not responded to properly;
(C)  a law, rule, policy, or procedure may need to be changed; or
(D)  additional training is needed;
(iii)  the death is caused by suicide; or
(iv)  the director of the Office of Services Review determines that another
reason exists to order that a formal fatality review be conducted.
